California statutes. Labor Code
======================================================================
  Labor Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: September 26, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the Labor Code.

(History: Enacted By Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The provisions of this code, in so far as they are substantially the same as existing provisions relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

All persons who, at the time this code goes into effect, hold office under any of the acts repealed by this code, which offices are continued by this code, continue to hold the same according to the former tenure thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

No action or proceeding commenced before this code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by the provisions of this code, but all procedure thereafter taken therein shall conform to the provisions of this code so far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions hereinafter set forth shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Division, part, chapter, article, and section headings contained herein shall not be deemed to govern, limit, modify or in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of any division, part, chapter, article, or section hereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Whenever, by the provisions of this code, an administrative power is granted to a public officer or a duty imposed upon such an officer, the power may be exercised or the duty performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized pursuant to law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Writing includes any form of recorded message capable of comprehension by ordinary visual means. Whenever any notice, report, statement or record is required by this code, it shall be made in writing.

Wherever any notice or other communication is required by this code to be mailed by registered mail by or to any person or corporation, the mailing of such notice or other communication by certified mail shall be deemed to be a sufficient compliance with the requirements of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1089, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Whenever any reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other law of this State, such reference shall apply to all amendments and additions thereto now or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

“Section” means a section of this code unless some other statute is specifically mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses; and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

The masculine gender includes the feminine and neuter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

12.1.

The Legislature hereby declares its intent that the terms “man” or “men” where appropriate shall be deemed “person” or “persons” and any references to the terms “man” or “men” in sections of this code be changed to “person” or “persons” when such code sections are being amended for any purpose. This section is declaratory and not amendatory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

12.2.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 62.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

“County” includes “city and county.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

“Oath” includes affirmation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

“Signature” or “subscription” includes mark when the signer or subscriber can not write, such signer’s or subscriber’s name being written near the mark by a witness who writes his own name near the signer’s or subscriber’s name; but a signature or subscription by mark can be acknowledged or can serve as a signature or subscription to a sworn statement only when two witnesses so sign their own names thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

“Person” means any person, association, organization, partnership, business trust, limited liability company, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 178.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18.5.

“Agency” means the Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 859, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

“Department” means Department of Industrial Relations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

19.5.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 859, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

“Director” means Director of Industrial Relations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

“Labor Commissioner” means Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

“Violation” includes a failure to comply with any requirement of the code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

Except in cases where a different punishment is prescribed, every offense declared by this code to be a misdemeanor is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail, not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 187.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

If any provision of this code, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid the remainder of the code, and the application of its provisions to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

25.

“Sheriff” includes “marshal.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

26.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, no person who has not previously obtained a license regulated by this code shall be denied a license solely on the basis that he has been convicted of a crime if he has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Section 4852.01 and following of the Penal Code, and if his probation has been terminated and the information or accusation has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

27.

Whenever the term “workers’ compensation judge” or “workers’ compensation referee” is used in this code in connection with the workers’ compensation law, the term shall mean “workers’ compensation administrative law judge.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

28.

For injuries occurring on and after January 1, 1991, whenever the term “independent medical examiner” is used in this code, the term shall mean “qualified medical evaluator.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1550, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

29.

“Medical director” means the physician appointed by the administrative director pursuant to Section 122.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

29.5.

The Governor shall annually issue a proclamation declaring April 28 as Workers’ Memorial Day in remembrance of the courage and integrity of American workers, and recommending that the day be observed in an appropriate manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. DEPARTMENT OF INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS [50. - 182.]



CHAPTER 1. General Powers and Duties [50. - 64.5.]

50.

There is in the Labor and Workforce Development Agency the Department of Industrial Relations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 859, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50.5.

One of the functions of the Department of Industrial Relations is to foster, promote, and develop the welfare of the wage earners of California, to improve their working conditions, and to advance their opportunities for profitable employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

50.6.

The Department of Industrial Relations may assist and cooperate with the Wage and Hour Division, and the Children’s Bureau, United States Department of Labor, in the enforcement within this State of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, and, subject to the regulations of the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division, or the Chief of the Children’s Bureau, and subject to the laws of the State applicable to the receipt and expenditures of money, may be reimbursed by the division or the bureau for the reasonable cost of such assistance and cooperation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

50.7.

(a) The Department of Industrial Relations is the state agency designated to be responsible for administering the state plan for the development and enforcement of occupational safety and health standards relating to issues covered by corresponding standards promulgated under the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596). The state plan shall be consistent with the provisions of state law governing occupational safety and health, including, but not limited to, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 148) of Division 1, and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300), of this code.

(b) The budget and budget bill submitted pursuant to Article IV, Section 12 of the California Constitution shall include in the item for the support of the Department of Industrial Relations amounts sufficient to fully carry out the purposes and provisions of the state plan and this code in a manner which assures that the risk of industrial injury, exposure to toxic substances, illness and death to employees will be minimized.

(c) Because Federal grants are available, maximum Federal funding shall be sought and, to the extent possible, the cost of administering the state plan shall be paid by funds obtained from federal grants.

(d) The Governor and the Department of Industrial Relations shall take all steps necessary to prevent withdrawal of approval for the state plan by the Federal government. If Federal approval of the state plan has been withdrawn before passage of this initiative, or if it is withdrawn at any time after passage of this initiative, the Governor shall submit a new state plan immediately so that California shall be approved and shall continue to have access to Federal funds.

(History: Amended November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 97.   Note: Prop. 97 is titled the California Occupational Safety and Health Restoration Act.)
-------------------------------------------

50.8.

The department shall develop a long range program for upgrading and expanding the resources of the State of California in the area of occupational health and medicine. The program shall include a contractual agreement with the University of California for the creation of occupational health centers affiliated with regional schools of medicine and public health. One such occupational health center shall be situated in the northern part of the state and one in the southern part. The primary function of these occupational health centers shall be the training of occupational physicians and nurses, toxicologists, epidemiologists, and industrial hygienists. In addition, the centers shall serve as referral centers for occupational illnesses and shall engage in research on the causes, diagnosis, and prevention of occupational illnesses.

The centers shall also inform the Division of Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the Department of Industrial Relations, State Department of Health Services, and the Department of Food and Agriculture of their clinical and research findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1245.   Note: See changes set forth in Governor's Reorg. Plan 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

50.9.

In furtherance of the provisions of Section 50.5, the director, or the Director of Employment Development, may comment on the impact of actions or projects proposed by public agencies on opportunities for profitable employment, and such agencies shall consider such comments in their decisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

51.

The department shall be conducted under the control of an executive officer known as Director of Industrial Relations. The Director of Industrial Relations shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate and hold office at the pleasure of the Governor and shall receive an annual salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

52.

Except as otherwise prescribed in this code, the provisions of the Government Code relating to departments of the State shall govern and apply to the conduct of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

53.

Whenever in Section 1001 or in Part 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code “head of the department” or similar designation occurs, the same shall, for the purposes of this code, mean the director, except that in respect to matters which by the express provisions of this code are committed to or retained under the jurisdiction of the Division of Workers’ Compensation, the State Compensation Insurance Fund, the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board, the Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board, or the Industrial Welfare Commission the designation shall mean the Division of Workers’ Compensation, the Administrative Director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation, the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, the State Compensation Insurance Fund, the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board, the Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board, or the Industrial Welfare Commission, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

54.

The director shall perform all duties, exercise all powers and jurisdiction, assume and discharge all responsibilities, and carry out and effect all purposes vested by law in the department, except as otherwise expressly provided by this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

54.5.

The director may appoint an attorney and assistants licensed to practice law in this state. In the absence of an appointment, the attorney for the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall also perform legal services for the department as the Director of Industrial Relations may direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

55.

For the purpose of administration the director shall organize the department subject to the approval of the Governor, in the manner he deems necessary properly to segregate and conduct the work of the department. Notwithstanding any provision in this code to the contrary, the director may require any division in the department to assist in the enforcement of any or all laws within the jurisdiction of the department. Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the director may, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, make rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and to effectuate its purposes. The provisions of this section, however, shall not apply to the Division of Workers’ Compensation or the State Compensation Insurance Fund, except as to any power or jurisdiction within those divisions as may have been specifically conferred upon the director by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

56.

The work of the department shall be divided into at least five divisions known as the Division of Workers’ Compensation, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, and the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 77.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

57.

Each division shall be in charge of a chief who shall be appointed by the Governor and shall receive a salary fixed in accordance with law, and shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

57.1.

(a) The Chief of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall receive an annual salary as provided by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) All officers or employees of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health employed after the operative date of this section shall be appointed by the director in accordance with the provisions of the State Civil Service Act. Notwithstanding the foregoing, two deputy chiefs of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice of the Director of Industrial Relations, to serve at the pleasure of the Director of Industrial Relations. The two deputy chiefs shall be exempt from civil service. The annual salaries of the two exempted deputy chiefs shall be fixed by the Director of Industrial Relations, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

57.2.

(a) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature and notwithstanding any other law, upon intake of a complaint from an agricultural
 employee by any department, division, or board within the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, the appropriate entity shall collaborate with each other and take all reasonable efforts to transmit the complaint to the appropriate entity for processing and investigation.

(2) In transmitting a complaint to the appropriate entity, the transmitting entity shall not disclose the identity and personal information of the agricultural employee complainant to the extent prohibited by law without their consent.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Agricultural employee” means
 a person employed in any of the following:

(A) An agricultural occupation, as defined in Wage Order No. 14 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(B) An industry preparing agricultural products for the market, on the farm, as defined in Wage Order No. 13 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(C) An industry handling products after harvest, as defined in Wage Order No. 8 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(2) “Appropriate entity”
 includes, but is not limited to, the Agricultural Labor Relations Board, Department of Industrial Relations, Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, Division of Occupational Safety and
 Health, or Employment Development Department.

(3) “Reasonable efforts” shall be consistent with each entity’s confidentiality requirements, including, but not limited to, subdivision (c) of Section 6309.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   (AB 845)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

57.5.

All duties, powers, and jurisdiction relating to the administration of the State Compensation Insurance Fund shall be vested in the Board of Directors of the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

58.

The department shall have possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use of all commissions, divisions, and offices of the department and the title to all such property held for the use and benefit of the State is hereby transferred to the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

59.

The department through its appropriate officers shall administer and enforce all laws imposing any duty, power, or function upon the offices or officers of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

60.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of Divisions 4 and 4.5 of this code shall be administered and enforced by the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

60.5.

(a) The provisions of Part 1 of Division 5 of this code shall be administered and enforced by the department through the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, subject to the direction of the director pursuant to Section 50.7. 

(b) The Division of Occupational Safety and Health succeeds to, and is vested with, all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Division of Industrial Safety, which is hereby abolished, and any other jurisdiction conferred by law.

(c) All powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Chief of the Division of Industrial Safety are hereby transferred to the Chief of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(d) Any regulation or other action made, prescribed, issued, granted, or performed by the abolished Division of Industrial Safety in the administration of a function transferred pursuant to subdivision (b) shall remain in effect and shall be deemed to be a regulation or action of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health unless and until repealed, modified, or rescinded by such division.

(e) Whenever any reference is made in any law to the abolished Division of Industrial Safety, it shall be deemed to be a reference to, and to mean, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

60.6.

All persons serving in the state civil service in the Division of Industrial Safety or in the Occupational Health Branch of the State Department of Health Services, and engaged in the performance of a function transferred to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall, in accordance with Section 19370 of the Government Code, remain in the state civil service and are hereby transferred to the Department of Industrial Relations. The status, positions, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by their transfer and shall continue to be retained by them pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions the duties of which are vested in a position that is exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

60.7.

The Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall have possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, licenses, permits, agreements, contracts, claims, judgments, and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use of the Division of Industrial Safety and the Occupational Health Branch of the State Department of Health Services with respect to the functions of those organizations that are transferred to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

60.8.

The Division of Occupational Safety and Health may expend money appropriated for the administration of the laws the enforcement of which is committed to the division. Such expenditures by the division shall be made in accordance with law in carrying out the purposes for which the appropriations were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

60.9.

There is within the Division of Occupational Safety and Health an occupational health unit and an occupational safety unit, which shall assist in the performance of occupational health functions and occupational safety functions, respectively, assigned to the division by law. There is also within the occupational health unit an occupational carcinogen control unit responsible for implementing the division’s obligations pursuant to the Occupational Carcinogens Control Act of 1976 (Part 10 (commencing with Sec. 9000)). The division, in performing its responsibilities under this code, shall provide for laboratory services and service personnel with respect to occupational health matters by interagency agreement with the State Department of Health Services or another public entity, by contract with a private sector laboratory, or by establishment of a laboratory within the division, or by a combination thereof. In the event that the division contracts with the private sector for laboratory services, the division shall enter into an interagency agreement with the State Department of Health Services for quality control and performance evaluation of the contract laboratory as well as analysis of nonroutine laboratory samples.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 299, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

61.

The provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 shall be administered and enforced by the department through the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

62.

The department may expend money appropriated for the administration of the provisions of the laws, the enforcement of which is committed to the department. The department may expend such money for the use, support, or maintenance of any commission or office of the department. Such expenditures by the department shall be made in accordance with law in carrying on the work for which such appropriations were made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

62.5.

(a) (1) The Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund is hereby created as a special account in the State Treasury. Money in the fund may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for all of the following purposes, and may not be used or borrowed for any other purpose:

(A) For the administration of the workers’ compensation program set forth in this division and Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200), other than the activities financed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3702.5.

(B) For the Return-to-Work Program set forth in Section 139.48.

(C) For the
 enforcement of the insurance coverage program established and maintained by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 90.3.

(2) The fund shall consist of surcharges made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(b) (1) The Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund is hereby created as a special trust fund account in the State Treasury, of which the director is trustee, and its sources of funds are as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund is continuously appropriated for the payment of nonadministrative expenses of the workers’ compensation program for workers injured while employed by uninsured employers in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 3710) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 4, and shall not be used for any other purpose.
 All moneys collected shall be retained in the trust fund until paid as benefits to workers injured while employed by uninsured employers. Nonadministrative expenses include audits and reports of services prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3716.1. The surcharge amount for this fund shall be stated separately.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all references to the Uninsured Employers Fund shall mean the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in the event that budgetary restrictions or impasse prevent the timely payment of administrative expenses from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, those expenses shall be advanced from the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund. Expense advances made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reimbursed in full to the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund upon
 enactment of the annual Budget Act.

(4) Any moneys from penalties collected pursuant to Section 3722 as a result of the insurance coverage program established under Section 90.3 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund created under this section, to cover expenses incurred by the director under the insurance coverage program. The amount of any penalties in excess of payment of administrative expenses incurred by the director for the insurance coverage program established under Section 90.3 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund for nonadministrative expenses, as prescribed in paragraph (1), and notwithstanding paragraph (1), shall only be available upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(c) (1) The Subsequent Injuries
 Benefits Trust Fund is hereby created as a special trust fund account in the State Treasury, of which the director is trustee, and its sources of funds are as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund is continuously appropriated for the nonadministrative expenses of the workers’ compensation program for workers who have suffered serious injury and who are suffering from previous and serious permanent disabilities or physical impairments, in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 4750) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4, and Section 4 of Article XIV of the California Constitution, and shall not be used for any other purpose. All moneys collected shall be retained in the trust fund until paid as benefits to workers
 who have suffered serious injury and who are suffering from previous and serious permanent disabilities or physical impairments. Nonadministrative expenses include audits and reports of services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4755. The surcharge amount for this fund shall be stated separately.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, all references to the Subsequent Injuries Fund shall mean the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in the event that budgetary restrictions or impasse prevent the timely payment of administrative expenses from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, those expenses shall be advanced from the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund. Expense advances made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reimbursed in full to the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund upon enactment of the annual Budget
 Act.

(d) (1) The Occupational Safety and Health Fund is hereby created as a special account in the State Treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for support of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board, and the Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board, and the activities these entities perform as set forth in this division, and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300).

(2) On and after the effective date of the act amending this section to add this paragraph in the 2013–14 Regular Session of the Legislature, any moneys in the Cal-OSHA Targeted Inspection and Consultation Fund and any assets, liabilities, revenues, expenditures, and encumbrances of that fund, less five million dollars ($5,000,000), shall be transferred to the
 Occupational Safety and Health Fund. On June 30, 2014, the remaining five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the Cal-OSHA Targeted Inspection and Consultation Fund, or any remaining balance in that fund, shall be transferred to, and become part of, the Occupational Safety and Health Fund.

(e) The Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund is hereby created as a special account in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the support of the activities that the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement performs pursuant to this division and Division 2 (commencing with Section 200), Division 3 (commencing with Section 2700), and Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200).

(f) (1) (A) Separate surcharges shall be levied by the director upon all employers, as defined in Section
 3300, for purposes of deposit in the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund, the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund,
 the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund, and the Occupational Safety and Health Fund. The total amount of the surcharges shall be allocated between self-insured employers and insured employers in proportion to payroll respectively paid in the most recent year for which payroll information is available. The director shall adopt reasonable regulations governing the manner of collection of the surcharges. The regulations shall require the surcharges to be paid by self-insurers to be expressed as a percentage of indemnity paid during the most recent year for which information is available, and the surcharges to be paid by insured employers to be expressed as a percentage of premium. In no event shall the surcharges paid by insured employers be considered a premium for computation of a gross premium tax or agents’ commission. In no event shall the total amount of the surcharges paid by insured and self-insured employers exceed the amounts reasonably necessary to carry
 out the purposes of this section.

(B) Assessments shall be levied by the director upon all employers, as defined in Section 3300, as necessary, to collect the aggregate amount determined by the Fraud Assessment Commission pursuant to Section 1872.83 of the Insurance Code. Revenues derived from the assessments shall be deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account in the Insurance Fund and shall only be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the investigation and prosecution of workers’ compensation fraud and the willful failure to secure payment of workers’ compensation, as prescribed by Section 1872.83 of the Insurance Code. The total amount of the assessment shall be allocated between self-insured employers and insured employers in proportion to payroll respectively paid in the most recent year for which payroll information is available. The director shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing the manner
 of collection of the assessment. The rules and regulations shall require the assessment to be paid by self-insurers to be expressed as a percentage of indemnity paid during the most recent year for which information is available, and the assessment to be paid by insured employers to be expressed as a percentage of premium. In no event shall the assessment paid by insured employers be considered a premium for computation of a gross premium tax or agents’ commission.

(C) Any employer or insurer on behalf of its insured employers who fails to timely or completely make payment as required by this section shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the unpaid amount, unless it is shown that the failure to timely or completely make payment was for reasonable cause and was not the result of willful neglect, in which case the director may waive or reduce the penalty. The
 director may also waive or reduce the penalty if imposition of the penalty would otherwise be unjust. If the director waives or reduces the penalty, the director has the sole discretion to determine the terms and conditions under which the penalty is waived or reduced. The director shall return any penalty the director determines has been paid by mistake.

(D) (i) Any surcharges or assessments due by an employer or insurer on behalf of its insured employers under this section shall be paid by electronic funds transfer.

(ii) Any employer or insurer on behalf of its insured employers required to remit payment by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section who makes payment by other means shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the payment amount, unless it is shown that the failure to make payment by electronic funds transfer was for reasonable cause and was
 not the result of willful neglect, in which case the director may waive or reduce the penalty. The director may also waive or reduce the penalty if imposition of the penalty would otherwise be unjust. If the director waives or reduces the penalty, the director has the sole discretion to determine the terms and conditions under which the penalty is waived or reduced. The director shall return any penalty the director determines has been paid by mistake.
